termpaper.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 
+N !Noun! 
+V !Verb!
+Pr !Pronoun!

+Pl !Plural!
+Sg !Singular!

+Pv !Plural verb!
+Vsg !Verb Singular!
+Pt !PastTense!
+Prt !Present tense!



LEXICON Root
    Noun;
    Verb;
    Pronoun;

!Nouns!
LEXICON Noun
    mundu ninf;
    muthamaki ninf;
    gichiko ninf;
    kiratu ninf;
    gikombe ninf;

    !Plurals!
    mundu+N+Pl:andu #;
    muthamaki+N+Pl:athamaki #;
    gichiko+N+Pl:iciko #;
    kiratu+N+Pl:iratu #;
    gikombe+N+Pl:ikombe #;

!Verbs!
LEXICON Verb
    rira vinf;
    tengera vinf;
    hingura vinf;
    humuka vinf;
    hungura vinf;


    !Past tense!
    rira+V+Pt:ririre #;
    tengera+V+Pt:tengerire #;
    hingura+V+Pt:hingurire #;
    humuka+V+Pt:humukire #;
    hungura+V+Pt:hungurire #;
    
!Pronouns!
LEXICON Pronoun
    !First person!
    nie+Pr+Pl:ithue #;

    !Second person!
    we+Pr+Pl:inyue #;

    !Third person!
    ucio+Pr+Pl:acio #;
    

LEXICON ninf
    !Singular noun!
    +N+Sg:0  #;

LEXICON vinf
    !Singular verb!
    +V+Vsg:0 #;
    !Plural verb!
    +V+Pv:i #;
